Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 549a of Title 57, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Board of Corrections shall promulgate rules to


establish a verification process before a punishment of death is


executed as provided for in Section 1015 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


B. The requirements of the verification process established in


subsection A of this section shall include, but not be limited to:


1. A determination that the Department of Corrections has


faithfully adhered to the constitutional mandate against cruel and


unusual punishment pursuant to Article II, Section 9 of the Oklahoma

Req. No. 2968 Page 1


Constitution and the Eighth Amendment to the United States


Constitution;


2. Confirmation that any medical equipment was purchased from a


reputable medical equipment vendor, including a statement from the


vendor recognizing the intended use of such equipment and receipt of


purchase;


3. Confirmation that any Department of Corrections personnel


understand and comply with the protocol for executing a punishment


of death and are trained accordingly to execute such punishment.


Any personnel who desire to opt out of the execution of a punishment


of death may make application to the Department of Corrections to


not be present during the execution and such application shall be


approved by the Director of the Department of Corrections. The


Department of Corrections shall not take any adverse employment


action against an employee who opts out of being present during an


execution;


4. If punishment of death shall be carried out by the


administration of a lethal quantity of a drug or drugs:


a. documentation that the administrator of such drug or


drugs is properly licensed and certified to perform


the administration of such drug or drugs. Such


documentation shall include a national criminal


history record check as provided for in Section 150.9


of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and

Req. No. 2968 Page 2


b. confirmation that any such drug or drugs were


purchased from a reputable drug vendor, including a


statement from the vendor recognizing the intended use


of such drug or drugs and receipt of purchase;


5. Documentation that the immediate family members of the


victim of the crime resulting in the punishment of death are


properly informed of the execution date and their right to witness


the execution;


6. Confirmation that the list of attendees for the execution is


accurate and only includes those listed pursuant to subsection D of


Section 1015 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


7. Maintenance of an audio and visual recording of the


execution of a punishment of death to ensure a functional recording


during the entire execution process.


C. It is incumbent upon the Board to prevent the execution of a


punishment of death if any of the criteria in subsection B of this


section is not met.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2968 CN 1/15/2026 9:23:44 AM









Req. No. 2968 Page 3